Utah statutes.
75-7-812.   Discretionary powers -- Tax savings.
(1)  Notwithstanding the breadth of discretion granted to a trustee in the
terms of the trust, including the use of such terms as "absolute," "sole," or
"uncontrolled," the trustee shall exercise a discretionary power in good faith
and in accordance with the terms and purposes of the trust and the interests
of the beneficiaries.
(2)  Subject to Subsection (4), and unless the terms of the trust expressly
indicate that a rule in this section does not apply:
(a)  a person other than a settlor who is a beneficiary and trustee of a trust
that confers on the trustee a power to make discretionary distributions to or
for the trustee's personal benefit may exercise the power only in accordance
with an ascertainable standard relating to the trustee's individual health,
education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of Subsection
2041(b)(1)(A) or 2514(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect
on May 1, 2004; and
(b)  a trustee may not exercise a power to make discretionary distributions to
satisfy a legal obligation of support that the trustee personally owes another
person.
(3)  A power whose exercise is limited or prohibited by Subsection (2) may be
exercised by a majority of the remaining trustees whose exercise of the power
is not so limited or prohibited.  If the power of all trustees is so limited
or prohibited, the court may appoint a special fiduciary with authority to
exercise the power.
(4)  Subsection (2) does not apply to:
(a)  a power held by the settlor's spouse who is the trustee of a trust for
which a marital deduction, as defined in Subsection 2056(b)(5) or 2523(e) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on May 1, 2004, was previously
allowed;
(b)  any trust during any period that the trust may be revoked or amended by
its settlor; or
(c)  a trust if contributions to the trust qualify for the annual exclusion
under Subsection 2503(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on
May 1, 2004.
